Utah statutes.
15-9-116.   Civil remedies.
(1)  An educational institution has a right of action against an athlete agent
or a former student-athlete for damages caused by a violation of this chapter.
In an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)  Damages of an educational institution under Subsection (1) include losses
and expenses incurred because, as a result of the conduct of an athlete agent
or former student-athlete, the educational institution was injured by a
violation of this chapter or was penalized, disqualified, or suspended from
participation in athletics by a national association for the promotion and
regulation of athletics, by an athletic conference, or by reasonable self-
imposed disciplinary action taken to mitigate sanctions likely to be imposed
by such an organization.
(3)  A right of action under this section does not accrue until the
educational institution discovers or by the exercise of reasonable diligence
would have discovered the violation by the athlete agent or former student-
athlete.
(4)  Any liability of the athlete agent or the former student-athlete under
this section is several and not joint.
(5)  This chapter does not restrict rights, remedies, or defenses of any
person under law or equity.
